Vermont, session 2025-2026, H491.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PROPERTY DOLLAR EQUIVALENT YIELD, INCOME
DOLLAR EQUIVALENT YIELD, AND NONHOMESTEAD
PROPERTY TAX RATE FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026
For fiscal year 2026 only:
(1) Pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 5402b(b), the property dollar equivalent
yield shall be $8,596.00.
(2) Pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 5402b(b), the income dollar equivalent yield
shall be $12,172.00.
(3) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 5402(a)(1) and any other provision of
law to the contrary, the nonhomestead property tax rate shall be $1.703 per
$100.00 of equalized education property value.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 6061 is amended to read:
§ 6061. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
* * *
(17) “Equalized value of the housesite in the taxable year” means the
value of the housesite on the grand list for April 1 of the taxable year, divided
by the number resulting from dividing the municipality’s common level of
appraisal determined by equalization of the grand list for April 1 of the year
VT LEG #383902 v.1

No. 24 Page 2 of 2
2025
preceding the taxable year by the statewide adjustment of the taxable year as
defined in subdivision 5401(17) of this title.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: May 19, 2025
VT LEG #383902 v.1